Washington statutes.
RCW 36.12.090

Limitation on successive removal elections.

When the county seat of a county has been removed by a popular vote of the people of the county, it may be again removed, from time to time, in the manner provided by this chapter, but no two elections to effect such removal may be held within eight years.

[ 1985 c 145 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.12.090. Prior: 1890 p 319 s 9; RRS s 4006.]